North Carolina statutes. Chapter 162B. Continuity of Local Government in Emergency.
Article 1. In General.

§ 162B-1.
Designated emergency location of government.

The governing body of each political subdivision of this State is hereby authorized to designate by ordinance, resolution or other manner, alternate sites or places, within or without the territorial limits of such political subdivision and within or without this State, as the emergency location of government.

History.

1959, c. 349.

§ 162B-2.
Emergency meetings.

Whenever the Governor and Council of State acting together declare an emergency to exist by reason of actual or impending hostile attack upon the State of North Carolina and, due to the emergency so declared, it becomes imprudent or impossible to conduct the affairs of local government at the regular or usual place or places thereof, the governing body of each political subdivision of this State is hereby authorized to meet from time to time upon call of the presiding officer or a majority of the members thereof at the designated emergency location of government during the period of the emergency and until the emergency is declared terminated by the Governor and Council of State.

History.

1959, c. 349.

§ 162B-3.
Emergency public business; nature and conduct.

Whenever the public business of any political subdivision is being conducted at a designated emergency location outside the territorial limits thereof, the members of the governing body may exercise such executive and legislative powers and functions as are pertinent to continued operation of the local government upon return to within the respective political subdivision. Any action taken by any local governing body at a designated emergency location shall apply and be effective only within the territorial limits of the political subdivision which such governing body represents. During the period of time in which the public business is being conducted at a designated emergency location, the governing body may, when emergency conditions make impossible compliance with legally prescribed procedural requirements relating to the conduct of meetings and transaction of business, waive such compliance by adoption of an ordinance or resolution reciting the facts and conditions showing the impossibility of compliance.

History.

1959, c. 349.

§ 162B-4.
Provisions of Article control over local law.

The provisions of this Article shall be effective in the event it shall be employed notwithstanding any statutory, charter or ordinance provision to the contrary or in conflict herewith.

History.

1959, c. 349.